Illinois, session 104th, SB2916.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 5amended by adding Section 5-735 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 5/5-735 new)7    Sec. 5-735. Standardize forms.8    (a) No later than January 1, 2027, the Secretary of State 9shall develop standards concerning the collection of personal 10identification information on forms used by the public to 11conduct business with the State.12    (b) No later than January 1, 2028, each State agency shall 13make changes to all forms prescribed by that State agency for 14use by the public to conform to the standards developed by the 15Secretary of State under subsection (a). 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.